Utah statutes.
20A-3-107.   No ballots may be taken away -- Spoiled ballots.
(1)  A person may not take or remove any ballot from the polling place before
the close of the polls.
(2)  If any voter spoils a ballot, he may successively obtain others, one at a
time, not exceeding three in all, upon returning each spoiled one.
(3)  If any ballot is spoiled by the printer or a poll worker, the poll worker
shall give the voter a new ballot.
(4)  The poll worker shall:
(a)  immediately write the word "spoiled" across the face of the ballot; and
(b)  place the ballot in the envelope for spoiled ballots.
